Missouri, session 2026, HB1648.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 387, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 387.435, to read as follows:
387.435. A TNC shall not be vicariously liable under any law by reason of
owning, operating, or maintaining the digital network accessed by a TNC driver or
rider, or by being the TNC affiliated with a TNC driver, for harm to persons or property
that results or arises out of the use, operation, or possession of a motor vehicle operating
as a TNC vehicle while the driver is logged on to the digital network if:
(1) There is no negligence under sections 387.400 to 387.440 or criminal
wrongdoing under the federal or Missouri criminal code on the part of the TNC; and
(2) The TNC has fulfilled all of its obligations under sections 387.400 to 387.440
with respect to the TNC driver.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.